District of Columbia statutes.
32-1101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Authorized employee representative” means a person or persons selected and authorized by the employee or employees of a workplace to assist or represent the employee or employees in exercising their rights under the provisions of this chapter.

(2)

“Board” means the District of Columbia Occupational Safety and Health Board established by § 32-1105.

(3)

“Commission” means the District of Columbia Occupational Safety and Health Commission established by § 32-1106.

(4)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(5)

“Employee” means an individual working for an employer for a salary, wage, or other compensation or pursuant to any other contractual obligation, but does not include domestic servants.

(6)

“Employer” means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, stock association, agent, manager, representative, foreman, or any other person having control or custody of any place of employment or of any employee. The term “employer” shall include a District government or quasi-governmental agency and an entity established pursuant to interstate compact. The term “employer” shall not include the United States government or its agencies.

(7)

“Federal Act” means the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, approved December 29, 1970 (84 Stat. 1590; 29 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.).

(8)

“Inspection” means an examination of a workplace on a routine basis.

(9)

“Investigation” means an examination of a specific hazard, accident, injury, or death.

(10)

“Plan” means the occupational safety and health plan for the District provided for in § 32-1104.

(11)

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the United States Department of Labor.

(12)

“Standard” means an occupational safety and health standard that requires conditions or the adoption or use of 1 or more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes that are reasonably necessary or appropriate to provide safe or healthful employment and places of employment.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 2, 35 DCR 8250
This section is referenced in § 36-410.
1981 Ed., § 36-1201.